Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
General Provisions

403.010.
Court may grant divorce — Remarriage.

A jury shall not be impaneled in any action for divorce, alimony or maintenance, but courts having general jurisdiction may grant a divorce for the cause set out in this chapter. A decree of dissolution of marriage authorizes either party to marry again.

History.

2117, 2118: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 182, § 27; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 408, effective January 2, 1978.

403.020.
Grounds for divorce — Procedure in case of divorce on ground of insanity. [Repealed.]

403.025.
Proof in action for dissolution of marriage; credible witnesses.

The statements of a petition for dissolution of marriage concerning the residence of the parties and irretrievable breakdown of the marriage shall not be taken as true because of the respondent’s failure to deny the statements, and the facts as to residence of the parties must be proved by one (1) or more credible witnesses.

The petitioner or respondent in an action for dissolution of marriage may be considered a credible witness, within the meaning of subsection (1) of this section, to be utilized in order to prove residency of the parties. The provisions of this subsection shall be retroactive in effect.

History.

C.C. 422: amend. Acts 1892, ch. 57; trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1; 1974, ch. 340, § 1; 1988, ch. 61, § 1, effective July 15, 1988.

403.030.
Proof required for divorce. [Repealed.]

403.033.
Advisory committee appointment — Functions — Recommendations.

The judge of any Circuit Court may appoint an advisory committee to counsel with litigants in divorce actions. The committee shall serve without salary or expenses. The court may request the parties involved in these proceedings to appear before the said committee at a designated time and place. The committee may make recommendation to the court as to their conclusions from said counseling. These recommendations are not binding on the court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 238.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Hudson, Family Law — Custody of Children, 59 Ky. L.J. 529 (1970).

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Personal Rights and Privileges Resulting from Marriage, § 12.10.

403.035.
Required allegations and proof in addition to cause of divorce. [Repealed.]

403.036.
Mediation not to be ordered unless conditions are met.

In any court proceeding conducted pursuant to KRS

403.010

to

403.350

, if there is a finding of domestic violence and abuse, as defined in KRS

403.720

, the court shall not order mediation unless requested by the victim of the alleged domestic violence and abuse, and the court finds that:

The victim’s request is voluntary and not the result of coercion; and

Mediation is a realistic and viable alternative to or adjunct to the issuance of an order sought by the victim of the alleged domestic violence and abuse.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 99, § 15, effective July 15, 1996.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Motion for Conciliation Conference, Form 253.13.

403.040.
Annulment of divorce decree — Effect.

The court rendering a judgment for divorce may, at any time, annul it on the joint application of the parties, and restore the parties to the condition of husband and wife. The annulment voids the divorce decree and any separation agreement.

History.

2120: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 345, § 1; 1978, ch. 236, § 1, effective June 17, 1978.

403.041.
Judgment of divorce may be annulled.

A judgment of divorce from the bond of matrimony may be annulled by the court which rendered it, upon a petition verified by the parties in person so requesting.

History.

C. C. 426: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

403.042.
Judgment of divorce from bed and board may be annulled.

A judgment of divorce from bed and board may be annulled by the court which rendered it, at the instance of either party showing just cause therefor in an equitable action.

History.

C. C. 427: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

403.043.
Interlocutory decree required; when judgment final; interlocutory decree set aside, when. [Repealed.]

403.044.
Testimony in certain cases not taken for sixty days after complaint filed.

In divorce actions in which there are minor children who are the issue of the marriage no testimony other than on temporary motions shall be taken or heard before sixty (60) days have elapsed from the date of service of summons, the appointment of a warning order attorney or the filing of an entry of appearance or a responsive pleading by the defendant, whichever occurs first.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 43, § 2; 1972, ch. 253, § 1; 1980, ch. 45, § 1, effective July 15, 1980.

403.050.
Divorce from bed and board — Grounds and legal effect.

Divorce from bed and board may be rendered for any cause that allows divorce, or for any other cause that the court in its discretion considers sufficient. A divorce from bed and board shall operate as to property thereafter acquired, and upon the personal rights and legal capacities of the parties, as a divorce from the bond of matrimony, except that neither shall marry again during the life of the other, and except that it shall not bar curtesy, dower or distributive right. The judgment may be revised or set aside at any time by the court rendering it.

History.

2121.

403.055.
Wife may be allowed maintenance during pendency of action. [Repealed.]

403.060.
Disposition of property — Restoration of maiden name. [Repealed.]

403.065.
Proceedings for restoration of property. [Repealed.]

403.070.
Court to provide for care of children. [Repealed.]

403.080.
When wife may obtain order securing alimony and maintenance. [Repealed.]

403.090.
Friend of the court — Appointment — Tenure — Duties — Wage withholding collections — Compensation.

The fiscal court of any county may, by resolution, authorize the appointment of a “friend of the court.” If the Circuit Court of the county has but one (1) judge, the appointment shall be made by the judge. If the court has two (2) or more judges, the appointment shall be made by joint action of the judges, at the general term. The person appointed to the office of friend of the court shall serve at the pleasure of, and subject to removal by, the appointing authority. The person appointed shall be a licensed practicing attorney. The appointed person shall take the constitutional oath of office and shall give bond in such sum as may be fixed by the appointing judge or judges.

Except for those cases administered pursuant to 42

U.S.C. secs. 651

et seq., it shall be the duty of the friend of the court to supervise and enforce the payment of sums ordered or adjudged by the Circuit Court in divorce actions to be paid for the care and maintenance of minor children. All persons who have been ordered or adjudged by the court, in connection with divorce actions, to make payments for the care and maintenance of children, shall, if so ordered by the court, make such payments to the friend of the court. The friend of the court shall see that the payments, except for those cases administered pursuant to 42

U.S.C. secs. 651

et seq., are properly applied in accordance with the order or judgment. However, if the court so directs, the payments may be made through the juvenile session of District Court of the county; in such case the friend of the court shall render such assistance as may be required in keeping records concerning such payments and in the enforcement of delinquent payments, and the Circuit Court may direct that a designated amount or portion of the funds appropriated by the fiscal court for expenses of the friend of the court be paid to the juvenile session of District Court as reimbursement for the expenses incurred by the juvenile session of District Court in connection with the handling of such payments. The friend of the court shall promptly investigate all cases where payments have become delinquent, and when necessary shall cause the delinquent person to be brought before the court for the purpose of compelling payment. The friend of the court shall ascertain the facts concerning the care, custody, and maintenance of children for whom payments are being made, and shall report to the court all cases in which the children are not receiving proper care or maintenance, or in which the person having custody is failing to furnish proper custody. He shall make such other reports to the court as the court may require.

In the event that a waiver is granted under 42

U.S.C. secs. 651

et seq., allowing payment of wage withholding collections to be directed to the friend of the court, an obligor shall be given the option of payment either to the friend of the court or the centralized collection agency.

In any action for divorce where the parties have minor children, the friend of the court, if requested by the trial judge, shall make such investigation as will enable the friend of the court to ascertain all facts and circumstances that will affect the rights and interests of the children and will enable the court to enter just and proper orders and judgment concerning the care, custody, and maintenance of the children. The friend of the court shall make a report to the trial judge, at a time fixed by the judge, setting forth recommendations as to the care, custody, and maintenance of the children. The friend of the court may request the court to postpone the final submission of any case to give the friend of the court a reasonable time in which to complete the investigation.

The friend of the court shall have authority to secure the issuance by the court of any order, rule, or citation necessary for the proper enforcement of orders and judgments in divorce actions concerning the custody, care, and maintenance of children. In performing duties under subsection (4) of this section the friend of the court shall attend the taking of depositions within the county, and shall have authority to cross-examine the witnesses. In the case of depositions taken on interrogatories, the friend of the court may file cross-interrogatories. The friend of the court shall be duly notified of the time and place of the taking of depositions in all divorce actions where the parties have minor children, and shall attend the taking of all such depositions when the friend of the court deems it necessary for the protection of the minor children, or when the friend of the court may be directed by the court to attend.

The friend of the court shall not directly or indirectly represent any party to a divorce action except as herein authorized to represent the minor children of parties to a divorce action, but if an allowance is made for the support of a spouse and an infant child or children, may proceed to enforce the payment of the allowance made to the spouse also.

Where a friend of the court is acting as a designee of the cabinet pursuant to KRS

205.712

and an applicant for Title IV-D services pursuant to KRS

205.721

has requested a modification of an existing child support order pursuant to a divorce or other judicial order, the friend of the court shall seek the modification, providing all jurisdictional requirements are met. The friend of the court’s representation shall extend only for the limited purpose of seeking a modification of an existing child support order consistent with the provisions of KRS

403.212

or

403.2121

.

The fiscal court of any county which has authorized the appointment of a friend of the court under this section shall, by resolution, fix a reasonable compensation for the friend of the court and make a reasonable allowance for necessary expenses, equipment, and supplies, payable out of the general fund of the county, upon approval of the appointing judge or judges.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 166; 1948, ch. 168; 1956, ch. 214; 1964, ch. 169, § 1; 1966, ch. 161; 1968, ch. 150, § 1; 1974, ch. 386, § 95; 1980, ch. 188, § 180, effective July 15, 1980; 1994, ch. 330, § 7, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 255, § 16, effective July 15, 1998; 2022 ch. 122, § 4, effective July 14, 2022.

403.100.
Compensation of guardian ad litem when petitioner is victim of KRS Chapter 507, 508, 509, or 510 offense committed by respondent.

In any court proceeding conducted pursuant to KRS

403.010

to

403.350

, if the respondent is incarcerated for a conviction pursuant to KRS Chapter 507, 508, 509, or 510, where the petitioner is the victim, the guardian ad litem shall be paid by the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 27, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/14/2018). 2018 Ky. Acts ch. 27, sec. 2 provided that this statute as created in Section 1 of that Act shall be known and may be cited as Jeanette’s Law.

403.110.
Purpose of chapter.

This chapter shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its underlying purposes, which are to:

Strengthen and preserve the integrity of marriage and safeguard family relationships;

Promote the amicable settlement of disputes that have arisen between parties to a marriage;

Mitigate the potential harm to the spouses and their children caused by the process of legal dissolution of marriage;

Make reasonable provision for spouse and minor children during and after litigation; and

Make the law of legal dissolution of marriage effective for dealing with the realities of matrimonial experience by making irretrievable breakdown of the marriage relationship the sole basis for its dissolution.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 182, § 1.

403.120.
Marriage — Court may declare invalid.

The Circuit Court shall enter its decree declaring the invalidity of a marriage entered into under the following circumstances:

A party lacked capacity to consent to the marriage at the time the marriage was solemnized, either because of mental incapacity or deformity or because of the influence of alcohol, drugs, or other incapacitating substances, or a party was induced to enter into a marriage by force or duress, or by fraud involving the essentials of marriage;

A party lacks the physical capacity to consummate the marriage by sexual intercourse, and the other party did not at the time the marriage was solemnized know of the incapacity;

The marriage is prohibited.

A declaration of invalidity under paragraph (a), (b) or (c) of subsection (1) may be sought by any of the following persons and must be commenced within the times specified, but only for the causes set out in paragraph (a) may a declaration of invalidity be sought after the death of either party to the marriage:

For a reason set forth in paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (1), by party or by the legal representative of the party who lacked capacity to consent, who was the offended party or did not know of the incapacity, no later than 90 days after the petitioner obtained knowledge of the described condition;

For the reason set forth in paragraph (c) of subsection (1), by either party, no later than one (1) year after the petitioner obtained knowledge of the described condition.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 182, § 2.

403.130.
Rules of Civil Procedure to apply.

The Rules of Civil Procedure apply to all proceedings under this chapter, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

A proceeding for dissolution of marriage, legal separation, or declaration of invalidity of marriage shall be entitled “In re the Marriage of . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . and . . . . . .” A custody or support proceeding shall be entitled “In re the (Custody) (Support) of . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .”

The initial pleading in all proceedings under this chapter shall be denominated a petition. A responsive pleading shall be denominated a response. Other pleadings, and all pleadings in other matters under this chapter, shall be denominated as provided in the Rules of Civil Procedure.

In this chapter, “decree” includes “judgment.”

A decree of dissolution or of legal separation, if made, shall not be awarded to one (1) of the parties, but shall provide that it affects the status previously existing between the parties in the manner decreed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 182, § 3.

403.135.
Protection of personal identifiers in domestic relations cases.

If another section of this chapter or KRS

407.5311

or

407.5602

requires the provision of a personal identifier in a pleading, document, or exhibit filed with the court, the party making the filing shall provide the personal identifier in accordance with the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure.

The clerk of the court shall allow the unredacted sealed copy of the pleading, document, or exhibit containing personal identifiers to be accessed only by a party to the case, an attorney of record in the case, a judge of the court or other authorized court personnel, a duly authorized employee or agent of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services involved in child support matters attendant to the case, or a person authorized to view the copy by specific order of the court.

As used in this section, “personal identifier” means a Social Security number, name of minor child, date of birth, or financial account number.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 126, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2015 ch. 18, § 73, effective June 24, 2015.